Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1804
Committee; members; vacancy.

When a vacancy occurs on the committee, appointment to fill the vacancy shall be made for the balance of the term. A member whose term has expired shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB499, § 3.